Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.965

State fire service mobilization—Plan use for purposes other than fire suppression—Annual report.

The chief of the Washington state patrol must report on an annual basis the following information for each emergency or disaster in which the Washington state fire service mobilization plan was used for purposes other than fire suppression, and reimbursement was made under RCW 43.43.961:

(1) The type and nature of the disaster or emergency;

(2) The reasons why the host jurisdiction and mutual aid resources were exhausted;

(3) The additional risk resources provided under the mobilization plan;

(4) The cost incurred by the state patrol;

(5) The amount of reimbursement made under RCW 43.43.961 to the host jurisdiction and to each nonhost jurisdiction providing all risk resources; and

(6) An assessment and any recommendations of actions that can be taken by the host jurisdiction and its mutual aid network to prevent future use of the fire mobilization plan for similar disasters or emergencies.

[ 2015 c 181 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—2015 c 181: "The legislature recognizes the vital role that our state's fire service personnel play in responding not just to fires but to disasters of varying types and kinds. The legislature further recognizes that the fire service mobilization plan may be a more effective tool for use in all emergencies and disasters to which fire departments, fire districts, and regional fire protection service authorities typically respond. It is the intent of the legislature that state fire service mobilization be allowed in all incidents to which fire departments, fire districts, and regional fire protection service authorities typically respond, so long as the mobilization meets the requirements identified in the Washington state fire service mobilization plan. It is the intent of the legislature to review the use of the fire mobilization plan for emergencies and disasters other than fire suppression to determine if this policy should continue or be modified." [ 2015 c 181 s 1.]